Louisiana, session 2026, HB1046.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 24:972(A)(26) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§972. Membership; meetings; compensation; staff
A. The commission shall consist of the following members:
* * *
(26) The president of Power Coalition for Equity and Justice, or his
designee.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2661 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1046